Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1473
Contributions; legal name of contributor; violation; penalty.

A contribution shall not be made, directly or indirectly, by any person in a name other than the name by which that person is identified for legal purposes. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 73;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 46.